Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5345.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 16a. (1) Beginning June 1, 2028, an operator of a child care center or group child care home shall maintain, on its premises, a record of the up-to-date immunization rates for children in the care of and staff members of the child care center or group child care home. (2) Beginning June 1, 2028, each child care center receiving more than 12 minor children shall comply with all of the following concerning public reporting of the immunization status of the minor children in its care: (a) Provide to the parent or legal guardian of each minor child enrolled in the child care center information concerning the rates of immunization status of the minor children enrolled in the child care center. The information required to be provided under this subdivision includes all of the following: (i) The total number of minor children enrolled in each level of care in the child care center. (ii) The total number of minor children in each level of care in the child care center on whom the child care center has been provided documentation of up-to-date immunizations. (iii) The total number of minor children in each level of care in the child care center on whom the child care center has been provided a statement that no immunization has been obtained or will be obtained due to medical reasons, religious or philosophical conviction, or other objection to immunization. (iv) The percentage of fully vaccinated minors, partially vaccinated minors, and minors that were exempt from vaccination due to medical reasons, religious or philosophical conviction, or other objection to immunization. (b) Post all of the information required under subdivision (a) on the child care center's public website, with a link from the homepage, if the child care center has a public website. (c) Post a paper notice containing all of the information required under subdivision (a) in the main reception area of the child care center in a location within the plain view of the public. (3) The information required under subsection (2)(a) must be provided by sending an email to the email address the child care center has on record for the parent or legal guardian or, if the child care center does not have an email address on record, by United States mail to the mailing address on record for the parent or legal guardian. (4) The child care center must convert personal information into deidentified and aggregated data. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law.